Maryland, session 2025, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
23–401.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a member may retire with
a normal service retirement allowance if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1388*

HOUSE BILL 1388
(1) the member completes and submits a written application to the Board
of Trustees stating the date when the member desires to retire; and
(2) on or before the date of retirement, the member:
(i) has at least 30 years of eligibility service;
(ii) has a combined total of at least 30 years of eligibility service from
the Employees’ Pension System, the Teachers’ Pension System, the Employees’ Retirement
System, or the Teachers’ Retirement System; or
(iii) has attained the age and the years of eligibility service as follows:
Age Years of Eligibility
Service
62 with 5
63 with 4
64 with 3
65 or more with 2
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, on
retirement under this section, a member is entitled to receive a normal service retirement
allowance that equals the number of years of the member’s creditable service multiplied
by:
(1) 0.8% of the member’s average final compensation that is not in excess
of the Social Security integration level; and
(2) 1.5% of the member’s average final compensation that exceeds the
Social Security integration level.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (g) of this section, on retirement
under this section, a member who is subject to the contributory pension benefit under
Subtitle 2, Part II of this title is entitled to receive a normal service retirement allowance
that equals the sum of:
(1) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or after July
1, 1998 multiplied by 1.4% of the member’s average final compensation; and
(2) the greater of:
(i) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or
before June 30, 1998 multiplied by 1.2% of the member’s average final compensation; or
(ii) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or
before June 30, 1998 multiplied by:

HOUSE BILL 1388 3
1. 0.8% of the member’s average final compensation that is
not in excess of the Social Security integration level; and
2. 1.5% of the member’s average final compensation that
exceeds the Social Security integration level.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (g) of this section, a member who is
subject to the Alternate Contributory Pension Selection under Subtitle 2, Part III of this
title is entitled to receive a normal service retirement allowance that equals the sum of:
(1) the greater of:
(i) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or
before June 30, 1998 multiplied by 1.2% of the member’s average final compensation; or
(ii) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or
before June 30, 1998 multiplied by:
1. 0.8% of the member’s average final compensation that is
not in excess of the Social Security integration level; and
2. 1.5% of the member’s average final compensation that
exceeds the Social Security integration level; and
(2) the number of years of the member’s creditable service on or after July
1, 1998 multiplied by 1.8% of the member’s average final compensation.
(e) (1) This subsection applies only to a member who has a combined total of
30 years of eligibility service as provided in subsection (a)(2)(ii) of this section.
(2) A member is entitled to receive a normal service retirement allowance
that equals:
(i) an allowance based on the creditable service the member earned
in the Employees’ Pension System;
(ii) an allowance based on the creditable service the member earned
in the Employees’ Retirement System;
(iii) an allowance based on the creditable service the member earned
in the Teachers’ Pension System; plus
(iv) an allowance based on the creditable service the member earned
in the Teachers’ Retirement System.
(f) (1) A member who begins membership on or after July 1, 2011, may retire
with a normal service retirement allowance if:

HOUSE BILL 1388
(i) the member completes and submits a written application to the
Board of Trustees stating the date when the member desires to retire; and
(ii) on or before the date of retirement, the member:
1. has at least 90 years of combined age and years of
eligibility service; or
2. is at least 65 years old and has at least 10 years of
eligibility service.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, a member who is
subject to the reformed contributory pension benefit under Subtitle 2, Part IV of this title
is entitled to receive a normal service retirement that equals the number of years of the
member’s creditable service multiplied by 1.5% of the member’s average final
compensation.
(g) On retirement under this section, if a member’s annuity is greater than the
member’s normal service retirement allowance calculated under this section, the member’s
normal service retirement allowance shall equal the member’s annuity.
23–401.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DROP” MEANS THE DEFERRED RETIREMENT OPTION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) “DROP MEMBER” MEANS A MEMBER OF THE EMPLOYEES’
PENSION SYSTEM OR THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM WHO:
(I) IS ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP AS PROVIDED
IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) ELECTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THERE IS A DROP FOR ELIGIBLE MEMBERS OF THE EMPLOYEES’
PENSION SYSTEM AND THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM OR THE TEACHERS’
PENSION SYSTEM IS ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP IF THE MEMBER IS

HOUSE BILL 1388 5
ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A NORMAL SERVICE RETIREMENT UNDER § 23–401 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) AN ELIGIBLE MEMBER MAY ELECT TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP FOR
A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
(1) 7 YEARS;
(2) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN 32 YEARS AND THE MEMBER’S
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE AS OF THE DATE OF THE MEMBER’S ELECTION TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP AND RETIRE FROM THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM
OR THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM; OR
(3) A TERM SELECTED BY THE MEMBER.
(E) (1) AN ELIGIBLE MEMBER WHO ELECTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
DROP SHALL:
(I) COMPLETE AND SUBMIT A WRITTEN ELECTION FORM TO
THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES, ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES
PROVIDES, STATING:
1. THE MEMBER’S INTENTION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
DROP;
2. THE DATE WHEN THE MEMBER DESIRES TO RETIRE;
3. THE PERIOD THAT THE MEMBER DESIRES TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE DROP, AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION;
4. THE DATE WHEN THE MEMBER INTENDS TO
TERMINATE EMPLOYMENT IN THE FORM OF A BINDING LETTER OF RESIGNATION
SUBMITTED WITH THE MEMBER’S ELECTION FORM; AND
5. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE BOARD
OF TRUSTEES TO IMPLEMENT THE DROP; AND
(II) COMPLETE AND SUBMIT A WRITTEN RETIREMENT
APPLICATION FORM TO THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES, ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD
OF TRUSTEES PROVIDES.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE MEMBER’S ELECTION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
DROP IS IRREVOCABLE.

HOUSE BILL 1388
(F) (1) A DROP MEMBER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP SHALL
COMMENCE ON THE FIRST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING ACCEPTANCE BY THE
BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE DROP MEMBER’S COMPLETED ELECTION FORM,
RETIREMENT APPLICATION FORM, AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY
THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES.
(2) A DROP MEMBER IS A RETIREE OF THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION
SYSTEM OR THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM.
(G) PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP ENDS IF THE DROP PARTICIPANT:
(1) SEPARATES FROM EMPLOYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BINDING LETTER OF RESIGNATION SUBMITTED WITH THE MEMBER’S ELECTION
FORM;
(2) DIES;
(3) IS TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT AT ANY TIME BEFORE THE
DATE SPECIFIED ON THE MEMBER’S ELECTION FORM; OR
(4) SHORTENS THE TIME PERIOD FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP
BY DELIVERING TO THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE INTENT OF
THE DROP MEMBER TO TERMINATE EMPLOYMENT.
(H) (1) AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP,
THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL DETERMINE THE DROP MEMBER’S SERVICE
RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE UNDER § 23–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING ANY
OPTIONAL ALLOWANCE ELECTED UNDER TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) DURING THE PERIOD THAT A DROP MEMBER PARTICIPATES IN
THE DROP, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL:
(I) DEPOSIT THE DROP MEMBER’S SERVICE RETIREMENT
ALLOWANCE IN THE DROP FOR THE DROP MEMBER’S BENEFIT;
(II) ADJUST THE DROP MEMBER’S SERVICE RETIREMENT
ALLOWANCE EACH FISCAL YEAR AS PROVIDED IN §§ 29–401, 29–402, 29–406, AND
29–408 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(III) ACCRUE INTEREST ON THE AMOUNTS CALCULATED UNDER
ITEMS (I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR THE DROP MEMBER INTO THE DROP
AT THE RATE OF 4% A YEAR, COMPOUNDED ANNUALLY.

HOUSE BILL 1388 7
(3) A DROP MEMBER MAY NOT RECEIVE CREDITABLE SERVICE OR
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE DURING THE PERIOD THAT THE DROP MEMBER
PARTICIPATES IN THE DROP.
(4) A DROP MEMBER’S COMPENSATION DURING THE PERIOD THAT
THE DROP MEMBER PARTICIPATES IN THE DROP MAY NOT BE:
(I) SUBJECT TO THE EMPLOYER PICKUP PROVISIONS OF §
21–313 OF THIS ARTICLE OR ANY REDUCTION OR DEDUCTION AS A MEMBER
CONTRIBUTION FOR PENSION OR RETIREMENT PURPOSES; OR
(II) USED TO INCREASE THE DROP MEMBER’S AVERAGE FINAL
COMPENSATION.
(5) DURING THE PERIOD THAT A DROP MEMBER PARTICIPATES IN
THE DROP, THE DROP MEMBER SHALL:
(I) CONTINUE TO RECEIVE COMPENSATION, HEALTH
INSURANCE AND OTHER BENEFIT OPTIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER THE STATE
EMPLOYEE AND RETIREE HEALTH AND WELFARE BENEFIT PROGRAM
ADMINISTERED BY THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, AND ANY
OTHER BENEFITS AS AN EMPLOYEE;
(II) BE SUBJECT TO THE PERSONNEL LAW, REGULATIONS, AND
POLICIES APPLICABLE TO AN EMPLOYEE; AND
(III) RECEIVE RETIREMENT BENEFITS ONLY TO THE EXTENT
PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(6) THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES IS NOT REQUIRED TO ESTABLISH AN
INDIVIDUAL DROP ACCOUNT FOR EACH DROP MEMBER.
(7) EACH YEAR, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL PROVIDE A DROP
MEMBER WITH A WRITTEN ACCOUNTING OF THE DROP MEMBER’S ACCOUNT
BALANCE IN THE DROP.
(I) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON
TERMINATION OF A DROP MEMBER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP, THE BOARD
OF TRUSTEES SHALL PAY TO THE DROP MEMBER OR, IF THE DROP MEMBER HAS
DIED, THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OF THE DROP MEMBER, THE AMOUNT
ACCRUED IN THE DROP FOR THE DROP MEMBER UNDER SUBSECTION (H)(2) OF

HOUSE BILL 1388
THIS SECTION, REDUCED BY ANY WITHHOLDING TAXES REMITTED TO THE INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE OR OTHER TAXING AUTHORITY, IN A LUMP SUM.
(2) A DROP MEMBER OR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OF A DROP
MEMBER MAY DIRECT THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES TO PAY ALL OR A PORTION OF THE
AMOUNT ACCRUED FOR THE DROP MEMBER’S BENEFIT UNDER SUBSECTION (H)(2)
OF THIS SECTION DIRECTLY TO THE CUSTODIAN OF AN ELIGIBLE RETIREMENT PLAN
AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) A DROP MEMBER OR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OF A DROP
MEMBER IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE THE AMOUNT DUE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE:
(I) DATE OF TERMINATION OF THE DROP MEMBER’S
PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP;
(II) RECEIPT BY THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF A COMPLETED
APPLICATION TO RECEIVE THE DROP AMOUNT, ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES PROVIDES; AND
(III) RECEIPT BY THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF ANY OTHER
INFORMATION THAT THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES REQUIRES TO PROCESS PAYMENT OF
THE DROP MEMBER’S ACCOUNT BALANCE TO THE DROP PARTICIPANT, THE
DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OF THE DROP PARTICIPANT, OR THE CUSTODIAN OF AN
ELIGIBLE RETIREMENT PLAN.
(J) (1) AS OF THE FIRST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING TERMINATION
OF A DROP MEMBER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES
SHALL COMMENCE AND CONTINUE PAYMENT OF THE SERVICE RETIREMENT
ALLOWANCE, INCLUDING THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENTS AS PROVIDED IN
TITLE 29, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE, TO THE MEMBER AS PROVIDED IN § 23–401
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF A DROP MEMBER DIES BEFORE TERMINATION OF THE DROP
MEMBER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL PAY
ANY OPTIONAL ALLOWANCE ELECTED UNDER TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OF THE DROP MEMBER.
(K) (1) A DROP MEMBER IS ELIGIBLE TO APPLY FOR AN ACCIDENTAL
DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE UNDER § 29–109 OF THIS ARTICLE IF AFTER
THE DROP MEMBER COMMENCES PARTICIPATION IN THE DROP:

HOUSE BILL 1388 9
(I) THE MEMBER IS TOTALLY AND PERMANENTLY
INCAPACITATED FOR DUTY AS THE NATURAL AND PROXIMATE RESULT OF AN
ACCIDENT THAT OCCURRED IN THE ACTUAL PERFORMANCE OF DUTY, WHILE
PARTICIPATING IN DROP, AT A DEFINITE TIME AND PLACE, AND WITHOUT WILLFUL
NEGLIGENCE OF THE MEMBER; AND
(II) THE MEDICAL BOARD CERTIFIES THAT:
1. THE MEMBER IS TOTALLY INCAPACITATED, EITHER
MENTALLY OR PHYSICALLY, FOR THE FURTHER PERFORMANCE OF THE NORMAL
DUTIES OF THE DROP MEMBER’S POSITION BY THE OCCURRENCE DESCRIBED
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
2. THE INCAPACITY IS LIKELY TO BE PERMANENT; AND
3. THE MEMBER SHOULD BE RETIRED.
(2) (I) IF A DROP MEMBER IS GRANTED AN ACCIDENTAL
DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE, THE DROP MEMBER SHALL:
1. SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES, ON THE FORM THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES PROVIDES, TO RECEIVE
PAYMENT OF THE AMOUNT ACCRUED IN THE DROP IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION;
2. EXECUTE A WRITTEN WAIVER OF ANY BENEFITS TO
WHICH THE DROP MEMBER MAY BE ENTITLED UNDER THE DROP; AND
3. SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO RETIRE WITH AN
ACCIDENTAL DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE, ON THE FORM THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES PROVIDES, STATING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE DROP MEMBER’S
RETIREMENT AS AN ACCIDENTAL DISABILITY RETIREE.
(II) ON ACCEPTANCE OF THE APPLICATION FOR PAYMENT AND
APPLICATION TO RETIRE, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL COMMENCE PAYMENT
OF AN ACCIDENTAL DISABILITY ALLOWANCE TO THE DROP MEMBER AS PROVIDED
IN § 29–110 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT THAT THE DROP MEMBER’S AVERAGE FINAL
COMPENSATION SHALL BE COMPUTED AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE DROP
MEMBER’S APPLICATION FOR A SPECIAL DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE.
(III) IF AN ACCIDENTAL DISABILITY IS PAID UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES MAY NOT PAY

HOUSE BILL 1388
ANY OTHER BENEFITS TO THE DROP MEMBER OR BENEFICIARY OF THE DROP
MEMBER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the State Retirement Agency shall request a
determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service that confirms the continued
qualification under § 401 of the Internal Revenue Code of the Employees’ Pension System
and the Teachers’ Pension System, as amended under Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Within 5 days after receiving the determination letter requested under
subsection (a) of this section from the Internal Revenue Service, the State Retirement
Agency shall forward a copy of the letter to the Department of Legislative Services, 90 State
Circle, Annapolis, Maryland 21401.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect contingent on the receipt by the State
Retirement Agency of a favorable determination letter requested under Section 2 of this
Act from the Internal Revenue Service confirming that the Employees’ Pension System and
the Teachers’ Pension System, as amended under Section 1 of this Act, are qualified plans
under § 401 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) If a favorable determination letter requested under Section 2 of this Act is
received on or before July 1, 2027, Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the later of:
(1) the first day of the month after the State Retirement Agency receives
the determination letter; or
(2) July 1, 2026.
(c) If the State Retirement Agency does not receive a favorable determination
letter requested under Section 2 of this Act on or before July 1, 2027, Section 1 of this Act,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void and of no
further force and effect.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.